North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 14. Commercial And Sports Fisheries Licenses. [Repealed]

§§ 113-151 through 113-167.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-400, s. 5.4, effective July 1, 1999.

Cross References.

For provisions relating to coastal and estuarine commercial fishing licenses, see now

G.S. 113-168

to 113-173.